Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2421
Sale or delivery; violation; penalty.

Any licensed importer, manufacturer, or dealer who knowingly and intentionally sells or delivers a handgun in violation of sections 69-2401 to 69-2425 shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1991, LB 355, § 20;

Laws 1996, LB 1055, § 7.